Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB462.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5533(b) of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 5533. Infancy, insanity or imprisonment.* * *(b) Infancy.--(1) [(i)] If an individual entitled to bring a civil action is an unemancipated minor at the time the cause of action accrues, the period of minority shall not be deemed a portion of the time period within which the 123456789101112131415161718 action must be commenced. Such person shall have the same time for commencing an action after attaining majority as is allowed to others by the provisions of this subchapter.[(ii) As used in this paragraph, the term "minor" shall mean any individual who has not yet attained 18 years of age.](2) (i) If an individual entitled to bring a civil action arising from sexual abuse is under 18 years of age at the time the cause of action accrues, the individual shall have a period of 37 years after attaining 18 years of age in which to commence an action for damages regardless of whether the individual files a criminal complaint regarding the sexual abuse.(i.1) If an individual entitled to bring a civil action arising from sexual abuse is at least 18 and less than 24 years of age at the time the cause of action occurs, the individual shall have until attaining 30 years of age to commence an action for damages regardless of whether the individual files a criminal complaint regarding the sexual abuse.[(ii) For the purposes of this paragraph, the term "sexual abuse" shall include, but not be limited to, the following sexual activities between an individual who is 23 years of age or younger and an adult, provided that the individual bringing the civil action engaged in such activities as a result of forcible compulsion or by threat of forcible compulsion which would prevent resistance by a person of reasonable resolution:(A) sexual intercourse, which includes 20250HB0462PN0445 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 penetration, however slight, of any body part or object into the sex organ of another;(B) deviate sexual intercourse, which includes sexual intercourse per os or per anus; and(C) indecent contact, which includes any touching of the sexual or other intimate parts of the person for the purpose of arousing or gratifying sexual desire in either person.(iii) For purposes of this paragraph, "forcible compulsion" shall have the meaning given to it in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3101 (relating to definitions).](c) Temporary window to file claims.--Notwithstanding subsection (b), for an individual entitled to bring a civil action arising from sexual abuse if the individual was under 18 years of age at the time the cause of action accrued, and if the limitation period for that cause of action has expired, the civil action is revived and the individual shall have an additional period of two years from the effective date of this subsection to commence an action.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Forcible compulsion." As defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3101 (relating to definitions)."Minor." An individual who has not yet attained 18 years of age."Sexual abuse." The term shall include, but not be limited to, the following sexual activities between an individual who is 23 years of age or younger and an adult, provided that the individual bringing the civil action engaged in such activities 20250HB0462PN0445 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 as a result of forcible compulsion or by threat of forcible compulsion which would prevent resistance by a person of reasonable resolution:(1) sexual intercourse, which includes penetration, however slight, of any body part or object into the sex organ of another;(2) deviate sexual intercourse, which includes sexual intercourse per os or per anus; and(3) indecent contact, which includes any touching of the sexual or other intimate parts of the person for the purpose of arousing or gratifying sexual desire in either person.Section 2. Sections 8522(b)(10) and 8542(b)(9) of Title 42 are amended to read:§ 8522. Exceptions to sovereign immunity.* * *(b) Acts which may impose liability.--The following acts by a Commonwealth party may result in the imposition of liability on the Commonwealth and the defense of sovereign immunity shall not be raised to claims for damages caused by:* * *(10) Sexual abuse.--(i) Conduct which constitutes an offense enumerated under section 5551(7) (relating to no limitation applicable) if the injuries to the plaintiff were caused by actions or omissions of the Commonwealth party which constitute negligence.(ii) This paragraph shall apply retroactively to a cause of action that arose prior to the effective date of this subparagraph and prospectively to a cause of action that arises after the effective date of this 20250HB0462PN0445 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subparagraph.§ 8542. Exceptions to governmental immunity.* * *(b) Acts which may impose liability.--The following acts by a local agency or any of its employees may result in the imposition of liability on a local agency:* * *(9) Sexual abuse.--(i) Conduct which constitutes an offense enumerated under section 5551(7) (relating to no limitation applicable) if the injuries to the plaintiff were caused by actions or omissions of the local agency which constitute negligence.(ii) This paragraph shall apply retroactively to a cause of action that arose prior to the effective date of this subparagraph and prospectively to a cause of action that arises after the effective date of this subparagraph . * * *Section 3. This act shall apply as follows:(1) The addition of 42 Pa.C.S. § 5533(c) shall apply to revive an action that was barred by an existing statute of limitations on the effective date of this section.(2) The amendment of 42 Pa.C.S. §§ 8522(b)(10) and 8542(b)(9) shall apply retroactively to an action where the limitations period has not expired prior to the effective date of this section.(3) The amendment of 42 Pa.C.S. §§ 8522(b)(10) and 8542(b)(9) shall apply to an action subject to 42 Pa.C.S. § 5533(c) that was barred by an existing statute of limitations 20250HB0462PN0445 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 on the effective date of this section.Section 4. Nothing in this act shall permit the application of the addition of 42 Pa.C.S. § 5533(c) to an action:(1) that is subject to a final judgment which, on the effective date of this section, is not subject to appeal; or(2) that, on the effective date of this section, has been nonjudicially resolved in its entirety by the parties, in a form which is enforceable.Section 5. The Supreme Court of Pennsylvania shall have extraordinary jurisdiction to hear a challenge to or to render a declaratory judgment concerning the constitutionality of this act. The Supreme Court of Pennsylvania may take action as it deems appropriate, consistent with the Supreme Court retaining jurisdiction over the matter, to find facts or to expedite a final judgment in connection with the challenge or request for declaratory relief.Section 6. The provisions of this act are nonseverable. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remaining provisions or applications of this act are void.Section 7. Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (2) is necessary to effectuate the amendment of 42 Pa.C.S. §§ 8522(b)(10) and 8542(b)(9).(2) Section 10(3)(ii) of the act of November 26, 2019 (P.L.641, No.87), is repealed insofar as the section applies to 42 Pa.C.S. §§ 8522(b)(10) and 8542(b)(9).Section 8. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0462PN0445 - 6 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728